Hawaii statutes.
[§6K-8.6] Administrative violation system.
With the mutual consent of both the commission and the department, the
commission may use the civil natural resource violations system of the
department of land and natural resources; provided that the commission shall
act whenever the board is authorized to act, to process violations of chapter
6K or any rules adopted thereunder. [L 2004, c 142, §3]

Cross References

Civil natural resource violations act, see chapter 199D.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next